New Jersey, session 222, S2753.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1997, s.352 (C.30:4D-6f) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  An eligible alien as defined in section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 [(C.30:4D-1 et seq.)] (C.30:4D-3), who otherwise meets all eligibility criteria therefor is entitled to medical assistance provided pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6).  [An] With the exception of an individual eligible for medical assistance pursuant to paragraph b. of this section, an alien who does not qualify as an eligible alien but who is a resident of New Jersey and would otherwise be eligible for medical assistance provided pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6) is entitled only to care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition as defined in section 1903(v)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396b(v)(3)). b.  (1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, and to the extent permissible under federal statute, a pregnant undocumented immigrant who would otherwise qualify for medical assistance under section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6), but for immigration status, shall be entitled to receive such medical assistance through the end of the 60-day period beginning on the last day of the immigrants pregnancy. (2)   Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, and to the extent permissible under federal statute, a dependent child of an undocumented immigrant who is entitled to receive medical assistance pursuant to this subsection, shall be entitled to receive such medical assistance up to the age of one year. (3)   This subsection shall be implemented only to the extent that it is in compliance with the provisions of section 441(d) of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, (8 U.S.C. s.1621(d)). (4)   As used in this subsection, undocumented immigrant means an immigrant who resides in New Jersey, but who is unable to produce documentary evidence to verify the immigrants status as an eligible alien, as defined by section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), or to show that the immigrant is lawfully present in the United States. (cf: P.L.1997, c.352, s.2) 2.    (New Section) To the extent allowable, the Commissioner of Human Services shall attempt to maximize federal financial participation in implementing the provisions of P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and shall apply for any federal waivers or state plan amendments as may be necessary to secure such federal financial participation.  If federal financial participation is not available, the benefits and services provided under P.L.    , c.     (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be financed with State funds only. 3.    (New Section) The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately, but remain inoperable until the Commissioner of Human Services receives a determination of federal financial participation regarding the implementation of the provisions of subsection b. of section 2 of this act.  If federal financial participation is not approved, the provisions of this act shall become operable upon the appropriation of State funds designated for the implementation of this act.